New York, session 2025-2026, A10723.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 8 of section 11-104 of the energy law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (c) to read as follows: 3 (c) "School property" shall mean in or within any building, structure, 4 athletic playing field, playground, parking lot, or land contained with- 5 in the real property boundary line of any daycare, preschool, public or 6 private elementary school, public or private secondary school or any 7 college or university. 8 § 2. Section 11-104 of the energy law is amended by adding a new 9 subdivision 10 to read as follows: 10 10. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, in a 11 city with a population of one million or more, no energy storage system 12 capable of storing more than twenty kilowatt hours shall be constructed 13 or maintained within five hundred feet of any school property or within 14 five hundred feet of any dwelling. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 16 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11740-02-5